Nebraska, session 109, LB991.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB991 LB991
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Data includes any image, photograph, video recording, or audio
recording;
(b) Law enforcement agency has the same meaning as in section
79-2702; and
(c) School bus has the same meaning as in section 60-658.
(2) A school district may:
(a) Install a stop-signal-arm camera system on any school bus owned
by the school district;
(b) Operate a stop-signal-arm camera system on any school bus owned
by the school district; or
(c) Enter into a contract with a private vendor to provide any of
the following services:
(i) Installation of a stop-signal-arm camera system on any school
bus owned by the school district;
(ii) Operation of a stop-signal-arm camera system on any school bus
owned by the school district; or
(iii) Support for the installation or operation of a stop-signal-arm
camera system on any school bus owned by the school district.
(3) The date, time, and location of any data collected by a stop-
signal-arm camera system under this section shall be imprinted on or
embedded within the data.
(4) Any school bus that has a stop-signal-arm camera system
installed on such school bus shall include a warning on such school bus.
Such warning shall:
(a) Indicate that a stop-signal-arm camera system is installed on
the school bus; and
(b) Be clearly readable from a distance of one hundred feet from the
warning.
(5) A school district may provide any data, or a copy of such data,
collected by a stop-signal-arm camera system if such camera system was
-2-

LB991 LB991
2026 2026
installed on a school bus owned by the school district at the time that
such data was collected.
Sec. 2. Section 60-6,175, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,175 (1) Upon meeting or overtaking, from the front or rear, any
school bus on which the yellow warning signal lights are flashing, the
driver of a motor vehicle shall reduce the speed of such vehicle to not
more than twenty-five miles per hour, shall bring such vehicle to a
complete stop when the school bus is stopped, the stop signal arm is
extended, and the flashing red signal lights are turned on, and shall
remain stopped until the flashing red signal lights are turned off, the
stop signal arm is retracted, and the school bus resumes motion. This
section shall not apply to approaching traffic in the opposite direction
on a divided highway or to approaching traffic when there is displayed a
sign as provided in subsection (8) of this section directing traffic to
proceed. Any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a Class
IV misdemeanor, shall be fined five hundred dollars, and shall be
assessed points on his or her motor vehicle operator's license pursuant
to section 60-4,182.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the driver
of any school bus, when stopping to receive or discharge pupils, shall
turn on flashing yellow warning signal lights at a distance of not less
than three hundred feet when inside the corporate limits of any city or
village and not less than five hundred feet nor more than one thousand
feet in any area outside the corporate limits of any city or village from
the point where such pupils are to be received or discharged from the
bus. At the point of receiving or discharging pupils, the bus driver
shall bring the school bus to a stop, extend a stop signal arm, and turn
on the flashing red signal lights. After receiving or discharging pupils,
the bus driver shall turn off the flashing red signal lights, retract the
stop signal arm, and then proceed on the route.
-3-

LB991 LB991
2026 2026
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, no
school bus shall stop to load or unload pupils outside of the corporate
limits of any city or village or on any part of the state highway system
within the corporate limits of a city or village, unless there is at
least four hundred feet of clear vision in each direction of travel.
(b) If four hundred feet of clear vision in each direction of travel
is not possible as determined by the school district, a school bus may
stop to load or unload pupils if there is proper signage installed
indicating that a school bus stop is ahead.
(4) All pupils shall be received and discharged from the right front
entrance of every school bus. If such pupils must cross a roadway, the
bus driver shall instruct such pupils to cross in front of the school bus
and the bus driver shall keep such school bus halted with the flashing
red signal lights turned on and the stop signal arm extended until such
pupils have reached the opposite side of such roadway.
(5) The driver of a vehicle upon a divided highway need not stop
upon meeting or passing a school bus which is on a different roadway or
when upon a freeway and such school bus is stopped in a loading zone
which is a part of or adjacent to such highway and where pedestrians are
not permitted to cross the roadway.
(6) Every school bus shall bear upon the front and rear thereof
plainly visible signs containing the words school bus in letters not less
than eight inches high.
(7) When a school bus is being operated upon a highway for purposes
other than the actual transportation of children either to or from school
or school-sponsored activities, all markings thereon indicating school
bus shall be covered or concealed. The stop signal arm and system of
flashing yellow warning signal lights and flashing red signal lights
shall not be operable through the usual controls.
(8) When a school bus is (a) parked in a designated school bus
loading area which is out of the flow of traffic and which is adjacent to
-4-

LB991 LB991
2026 2026
a school site or (b) parked on a roadway which possesses more than one
lane of traffic flowing in the same direction and which is adjacent to a
school site, the bus driver shall engage only the hazard warning flasher
lights when receiving or discharging pupils if a school bus loading area
warning sign is displayed. Such signs shall not be directly attached to
any school bus but shall be free standing and placed at the rear of a
parked school bus or line of parked school buses. No school district
shall utilize a school bus loading area warning sign unless such sign
complies with the manual. The manual shall include the requirements for
size, material, construction, and required wording. The cost of any sign
shall be an obligation of the school district.
(9)(a) A violation of this section may be enforced through the use
of a stop-signal-arm camera system as described in section 1 of this act
if a peace officer has reviewed the data as defined in section 1 of this
act and chooses to issue a citation.
(b) A citation that is issued under this subsection shall be mailed
to the registered owner of the motor vehicle not later than six days
after the alleged violation occurred.
(c) Such registered owner may appeal the citation to the law
enforcement agency that employed the peace officer at the time of the
citation. Such appeal shall occur no later than thirty days after
delivery of the citation. Such registered owner may provide evidence to
such law enforcement agency that the registered owner was not the driver
of the motor vehicle at the time of the alleged violation. Such law
enforcement agency shall rescind the citation if such law enforcement
agency finds adequate evidence to rescind the citation.
Sec. 3. Original section 60-6,175, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-5-